Utah statutes.
34-29-16.   Action on bond -- Brought in name of injured party.

Any action brought in any court against any employment or intelligence agent upon the bond deposited with the city, town or county treasurer by this employment or intelligence agent as provided in Section 34-29-4 may be brought in the name of the party injured.

